src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Choctaw language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON pre-dem
 +N:0 N-dem ;
 +N:0 N-dem-clausal ;

LEXICON N-case
 +Nom:^%{nom%}               # ;
 +Acc:^%{acc%}               # ;
 @D.REQC@+Acc:@D.REQC@      # ; ! Sometimes accusative is unmarked
 @D.REQC@:@D.REQC@          # ; ! Sometimes no case is marked
 @D.REQC@+Nom2:@D.REQC@^ato # ; ! +focus
 @D.REQC@+Acc2:@D.REQC@^ano # ;
 @D.REQC@+Too:@D.REQC@^kia  # ; ! = also, too, replaces case marker, also means "every" on kaNna and naNna, "but" on verbs (TODO) 

LEXICON N-dem-clausal
 @U.DEM.THAT@+That:@U.DEM.THAT@^m%{a%}%{k%} N-det-clausal ; ! Can appear twice
 @U.DEM.THIS@+This:@U.DEM.THIS@^p%{a%}%{k%} N-det-clausal ; ! Can appear twice
 @P.DEM.OBL@+Obl:@P.DEM.OBL@^ak           N-det-clausal ;
 N-det-clausal ;

LEXICON N-dem
 @U.DEM.THAT@+That:@U.DEM.THAT@^m%{a%}%{k%} N-det ;
 @U.DEM.THIS@+This:@U.DEM.THIS@^p%{a%}%{k%} N-det ;
 N-det ;

LEXICON N-det
 @D.DEM.OBL@+Obl:@D.DEM.OBL@^ak           N-det2 ;
 +Pej:^akhii        N-det2 ;
 +Compar:^ook       N-pej  ;
 +Only:^ba          N-det2 ;
 +Too2:^makoo       N-det2 ;
 +Too2:^ohmakoo     N-det2 ; ! equivalent to makoo
 N-det2 ;

LEXICON N-pej
 +Pej:^akhii N-det2 ;
 N-det2 ;

LEXICON N-det-clausal
 +Must:^polla       N-comp  ; ! must or because
 +Emph:^akiNli      N-tpart ;
 +Very:^fiihna      N-tpart ; ! very or exactly
 +Very:^fiihna      N-comp  ;
 +Only2:^baano      N-tpart ;
 +Prev:^aash        N-prev  ; ! previously mentioned, relatives, not marked for case unless with participial ending

LEXICON N-comp
 @P.REQC.T@+Comp+Con:@P.REQC.T@^ka^akoo N-case ;
 @P.REQC.T@+Comp:@P.REQC.T@^ka          N-case ; ! less frequent

LEXICON N-tpart
 +Tns+Part:^h^oo N-case ;
 +Tns:^h         # ; ! maybe less frequent?

LEXICON N-prev
 +Nom:^oosh # ;
 +Acc:^oN   # ;
 # ;

LEXICON N-det2
 +Con:^akoo N-case ;
 +Foc:^oo   N-case ;
 N-case ;
